src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
* **LEXICON N_AʼBBÕNZ** aʼbbõnz:aʼbbõn 228
* **LEXICON N_AʼBBÕNZ-SG** aʼbbõnz:aʼbbõn 228
* **LEXICON N_AʼBBÕNZ-PL** aʼbbõnz:aʼbbõn 228

* **LEXICON N_AŅGÕRZ** : aņgõrz:aņgõr 229
* **LEXICON N_AŅGÕRZ-PL** : aņgõrz:aņgõr 229

* **LEXICON N_KAʼGGÕRZ** kaʼggõrz:kaʼggõr 230

* **LEXICON N_PǞGIŅŽ** pǟgiņž:pǟgiņ 231

* **LEXICON N_VAGĀŖ** vagāŗ:vagār 232

* **LEXICON N_TIDĀR** tidār:tidār 233
* **LEXICON N_TIDĀR-PL** tidār:tidār 233

* **LEXICON N_PĒGAL** pēgal:pēgal 234
* **LEXICON N_PĒGAL-PL** pēgal:pēgal 234

* **LEXICON N_APPÕN** appõn:appõn 235
* **LEXICON N_APPÕN-SG** appõn:appõn 235
* **LEXICON N_APPÕN-PL** appõn:appõn 235

* **LEXICON N_ǬʼRÕN** ǭʼrõn:ǭrõn 236
* **LEXICON N_ǬʼRÕN-PL** ǭʼrõn:ǭrõn 236

* **LEXICON N_KĪNDÕR** kīndõr:kīndõr 237

* **LEXICON N_KĪNDÕR-SG** kīndõr:kīndõr 237
* **LEXICON N_KĪNDÕR-PL** kīndõr:kīndõr 237

* **LEXICON N_BÄʼZMÕR** bäʼzmõr:bäʼzmõr 238
* **LEXICON N_BÄʼZMÕR-SG** bäʼzmõr:bäʼzmõr 238
* **LEXICON N_BÄʼZMÕR-PL** bäʼzmõr:bäʼzmõr 238

* **LEXICON N_TARĪĻ** tarīļ:tarīļ 239
* **LEXICON N_TARĪĻ-PL** tarīļ:tarīļ 239

* **LEXICON N_ĀNKAŖ** ānkaŗ:ānkaŗ 240
* **LEXICON N_ĀNKAŖ-PL** ānkaŗ:ānkaŗ 240

* **LEXICON N_VIRPÕĻ** virpõļ:virpõļ 241

* **LEXICON N_ǬʼBIĻ** ǭʼbiļ:ǭbiļ 242
* **LEXICON N_ǬʼBIĻ-PL** ǭʼbiļ:ǭbiļ 242

* **LEXICON N_GOLĀTÕKS** golātõks:golātõks 244 found in Liv-est-lat dictionary

## Nominal inflection
Inflection lexica
* **LEXICON NMN_PŪ** pū:pū 12
Stem change: None

13
* Yaml: **N-rooq**
Stem	change:	None

14
Stem	change:	Yes 
Vowel raising ǟ:ē +Pl +Ela/+Ill/+Par
Stød: Yes

* **LEXICON NMN_TĪE** tīe:tīʼe
15
Stem change: Yes
Vowel lowering īe:ē +Pl +Ela/+Ill/+Par
Stød: Yes
* **SG-ILL_zõ ;** 2014.12.12 Stød loss problem,
		    	should be tīʼezõ

tiēšti

16
Stem change: None

* **LEXICON NMN_TEI** tei:tei
17
Stem change: Yes 
Vowel change: ei:ē

* **LEXICON NMN_KUŖĒ** kuŗē:kuʼŗ
18
kuŗē:kuʼŗ

SG-INE ;

18
* **LEXICON NMN_KALĀ** kalā:kaʼl
Stem change: Yes
Consonant lengthening
Consonant palatalization
Vowel change in 2nd syllable ā:õ/0
Stød: Yes

18a
* **LEXICON NMN_IRĒ** irē:iʼr
Stem change: Yes
Consonant lengthening
Consonant palatalization
Vowel change in 2nd syllable ā:õ/0
Stød: Yes

19
* **LEXICON NMN_TUBĀ** tubā:tuʼb
* Yaml: **A-amaa, N-tubaa** Pass: 2014.12.12
Stem change:	 Yes
Vowel change in word-final position a:õ/0
Stød

19a
* **LEXICON NMN_AMĀ** amā:tuʼb
* Yaml: **A-amaa, N-tubaa** Pass: 2014.12.12
Stem change:	 Yes
Vowel change in word-final position a:õ/0
Stød

20
* **LEXICON NMN_AIGĀ** aigā:aʼig
* Yaml: **N-aigaa** 
Stem change: Yes
vowel in 2nd syllable ā:õ/0
Stød: Yes

* **LEXICON NMN_LĒBA** lēba:leib
21
* Yaml: **N-leeba** Passed: 2014.12.12
Stem change: Yes
vowel change ei:e
Stød: None

21
* **LEXICON NMN_KŪJA** kūja:leiba
No information

22
* **LEXICON NMN_PŪOGA** pūoga:p
Stem change: Yes
Vowel change in 1st syllable ūo:ȯi
Vowel change in word-final position a:õ/0
Stød: None

23
Stem change: Yes
Vowel change in 1st syllable ǭ:a
Consonant change ij:j
Stød: None

24
* **LEXICON NMN_PǞVA** pǟva:pǟuva
Stem change: Yes
Vowel change ǟ:äu
Stød: None

* **LEXICON NMN_IZĀ** izā:iʼz
25
Stem change: yes
Vowel loss ā:0
Stød: Yes

25
* **LEXICON NMN_PIEZĀ** piezā:pieʼzzā
Stem change: yes
Stød: Yes

Stem change: Yes

* **LEXICON NMN_AŽĀ-SG** ažā:aʼžžā 26

* **LEXICON NMN_AŽĀ-PL** ažā:aʼžā 26

Stem change: Yes (Vowel)
* **LEXICON NMN_ĀĻDŽA-SG** āļdža:āļdža 27

* **LEXICON NMN_ĀĻDŽA-PL** āļdža:āļdža 27

* **LEXICON NMN_SUKĀ** sukā:sukkā 28
Stem change: Yes
* **LEXICON NMN_SUKĀ-SG** sukā:sukkā 28

* **LEXICON NMN_SUKĀ-PL** sukā:sukkā 28

* **LEXICON NMN_LIEPĀ** liepā:liep 29
Stem change: Yes
consonant length
Stød: None
* **LEXICON NMN_LIEPĀ-SG** liepā:lieppā 29

* **LEXICON NMN_LIEPĀ-PL** liepā:lieppā 29

* **LEXICON NMN_OKSĀ** oksā:oksā 30
Stem change: Yes
palatalization s:š
Stød: None
* **LEXICON NMN_OKSĀ-SG** oksā:oksā 30

* **LEXICON NMN_OKSĀ-PL** oksā:oksā 30

* **LEXICON NMN_VȰNTSA** vȱntsa:vȱntsa 31
Stem change:    Yes
Vowel length
??Palatalization?? of s:š
Stød: None
* **LEXICON NMN_VȰNTSA-SG** vȱntsa:vȱntsa 31

* **LEXICON NMN_VȰNTSA-PL** vȱntsa:vȱntsa 31

* **LEXICON NMN_LIESTĀ** liestā:liestā 32
Stem	change:	   Yes
Diphthong straightening
??Palatalization?? of s:š 
Stød: None
* **LEXICON NMN_LIESTĀ-SG** liestā:liestā 32

* **LEXICON NMN_LIESTĀ-PL** liestā:liestā 32

33
* **LEXICON NMN_ĀIGA** āiga:āig
Stem	change:	Yes
Vowel length in first syllable
Stød: None

33b LĀNGA
Stem	change:	Yes (Vowel)
Stød: None

34
* **LEXICON NMN_SĪLMA** sīlma:sīlma
Stem change:	Yes (Vowel)
Stød: None

35
* **LEXICON NMN_KǞNGA** kǟnga:kǟnga 35
* Yaml: **N-aeaerga, N-aeaerga**
Stem change: Yes
* **LEXICON NMN_KǞNGA-SG** kǟnga:kǟnga 35

* **LEXICON NMN_KǞNGA-PL** kǟnga:kǟnga 35

* Yaml: **N-aaina**
Stem change: Yes (Vowel)
* **LEXICON NMN_ĀINA-SG** āina:āina 36

* **LEXICON NMN_ĀINA-PL** āina:āina 36

37
* **LEXICON NMN_VĒNA** vēna:vēina
* Yaml: **N-veena**
Stem change: Yes (Vowel)

38
* **LEXICON NMN_RŌDA** rōda:rōuda
Stem change: Yes (Vowel)

39, 40, 41, 42
* **LEXICON NMN_PADĀ** padā:paʼd
Stem change: Yes
Stød: Yes

40

41
* **LEXICON NMN_KÄPĀ** käpā:käppā

42

43

44 

45
* **LEXICON NMN_PŪOLA** pūola:pūolla 45
* **LEXICON NMN_PŪOLA-SG** pūola:pūola 45

* **LEXICON NMN_PŪOLA-PL** pūola:pūolla 45

46

* **LEXICON NMN_ŪŠKA** ūška:ūiska 47
Stem change: Yes
vowel length
Stød: None
* **LEXICON NMN_ŪŠKA-SG** ūška:ūiska 47

* **LEXICON NMN_ŪŠKA-PL** ūška:ūiska 47

* **LEXICON NMN_MȬKA** mȭka:mȭuka 48
Stem change: Yes
vowel length
Stød: None
* **LEXICON NMN_MȬKA-SG** mȭka:mȭuka 48

* **LEXICON NMN_MȬKA-PL** mȭka:mȭuka 48

* **LEXICON NMN_DADŽĀ** dadžā:daʼdžā 49
* **LEXICON NMN_DADŽĀ-SG** dadžā:daʼdžā 49

* **LEXICON NMN_DADŽĀ-PL** dadžā:daʼdžā 49

* **LEXICON NMN_SUŠĀ** sušā:suššā 50
* **LEXICON NMN_SUŠĀ-SG** sušā:suššā 50
* **LEXICON NMN_SUŠĀ-PL** sušā:sušā 50

* **LEXICON NMN_KUPŠĀ** kupšā:kupšā 51
* **LEXICON NMN_KUPŠĀ-SG** kupšā:kupšā 51
* **LEXICON NMN_KUPŠĀ-PL** kupšā:kupšā 51

* **LEXICON NMN_TŠŪRTŠA** tšūrtša:tšūrtša 52
* **LEXICON NMN_TŠŪRTŠA-SG** tšūrtša:tšūrtša 52
* **LEXICON NMN_TŠŪRTŠA-PL** tšūrtša:tšūrtša 52

* **LEXICON NMN_SĒMḐA** sēmḑa:sēmḑa 53
* **LEXICON NMN_SĒMḐA-SG** sēmḑa:sēmḑa 53

* **LEXICON NMN_SĒMḐA-PL** sēmḑa:sēmḑa 53

* **LEXICON NMN_TĪERA** tīera:tīerra 54
Stem	    change:	 Yes
Stød: None
Sg Nom=Gen: Yes
* **LEXICON NMN_TĪERA-SG** tīera:tīer 54

* **LEXICON NMN_TĪERA-PL** tīera:tīer 54

* **LEXICON NMN_KRǬIPA** krǭipa:krǭipa 55
* **LEXICON NMN_KRǬIPA-SG** krǭipa:krǭipa 55

* **LEXICON NMN_KRǬIPA-PL** krǭipa:krǭipa 55

* **LEXICON NMN_LILLA** lilla:lilla 56
* **LEXICON NMN_LILLA-SG** lilla:lilla 56

* **LEXICON NMN_LILLA-PL** lilla:lilla 56

* **LEXICON NMN_KAFFE** kaffe:kaffe 56
* **LEXICON NMN_KAFFE-SG** kaffe:kaffe 56

* **LEXICON NMN_KAFFE-PL** kaffe:kaffe 56b

* **LEXICON NMN_KUȚĀ** kuțā:kuțā 57
* **LEXICON NMN_KUȚĀ-SG** kuțā:kuțā 57
* **LEXICON NMN_KUȚĀ-PL** kuțā:kuțā 57

* **LEXICON NMN_NĒTŠA** nētša:nētša 58
Stem change Yes
final vowel loss
Stød: None
* **LEXICON NMN_NĒTŠA-SG** nētša:nētša 58
* **LEXICON NMN_NĒTŠA-PL** nētša:nētša 58

59
kiv:kiʼvv

60

* **LEXICON NMN_KEP-SG** kep:kepp aʼb 61

* **LEXICON NMN_KEP-PL** kep:kep aʼb 61

* **LEXICON NMN_KRUȚK** : 62
* **LEXICON NMN_KRUȚK-SG** : 62
* **LEXICON NMN_KRUȚK-PL** : 62

* **LEXICON NMN_KRÄMP** : 63 krämp:krǟmp
* **LEXICON NMN_KRÄMP-SG** : 63
* **LEXICON NMN_KRÄMP-PL** : 63

* **LEXICON NMN_PIʼŅ** piʼņ:piņņ 64
* **LEXICON NMN_PIʼŅ-SG** piʼņ:piņņ 64

* **LEXICON NMN_PIʼŅ-PL** piņ:piʼņņ 64

* **LEXICON NMN_KUOȚ** : 65
* **LEXICON NMN_KUOȚ-SG** : 65
* **LEXICON NMN_KUOȚ-PL** : 65

* **LEXICON NMN_VAKȚ** : 66
* **LEXICON NMN_VAKȚ-SG** : 66
* **LEXICON NMN_VAKȚ-PL** : 66

* **LEXICON NMN_REŅ** : 67
* **LEXICON NMN_REŅ-SG** : 67
* **LEXICON NMN_REŅ-PL** : 67

* **LEXICON NMN_OKŠ** : 68
* **LEXICON NMN_OKŠ-SG** : 68
* **LEXICON NMN_OKŠ-PL** : 68

* **LEXICON NMN_KAŠ** : 69
* **LEXICON NMN_KAŠ-SG** : 69

* **LEXICON NMN_KAŠ-PL** : 69 kaš:kaš stem left alone

* **LEXICON NMN_DUŅTŠ** : 70
* **LEXICON NMN_DUŅTŠ-SG** : 70 duņtš:dūņtš
* **LEXICON NMN_DUŅTŠ-PL** : 70

* **LEXICON NMN_TORĪ** : 71
* **LEXICON NMN_TORĪ-SG** : 71
* **LEXICON NMN_TORĪ-PL** : 71

* **LEXICON NMN_VAʼG** vag:vaʼg 72
* **LEXICON NMN_VAʼG-SG** vag:vaʼg 72
* **LEXICON NMN_VAʼG-PL** vaʼg:vag 72

* **LEXICON NMN_KÕʼL** kõl:kõʼl 73
* **LEXICON NMN_KÕʼL-SG** kõʼl:kõʼl 73
* **LEXICON NMN_KÕʼL-PL** kõʼl:kõʼl 73

* **LEXICON NMN_SUʼG** suʼg:suʼg 74
* **LEXICON NMN_SUʼG-SG** suʼg:suʼg 74

* **LEXICON NMN_SUʼG-PL** suʼg:suʼg 74

* **LEXICON NMN_JOʼUG** joʼug:joʼug 75
* **LEXICON NMN_JOʼUG-SG** joʼug:joʼug 75
* **LEXICON NMN_JOʼUG-PL** joʼug:joug 75

76

* **LEXICON NMN_USK** usk: 77
* **LEXICON NMN_USK-SG** usk: 77
* **LEXICON NMN_USK-PL** usk: 77

* **LEXICON NMN_VAŠK** : 78 vašk:vask
* **LEXICON NMN_VAŠK-SG** : 78
* **LEXICON NMN_VAŠK-PL** : 78

* **LEXICON NMN_TUP** tup:tup 79
* **LEXICON NMN_TUP-SG** tup:tup 79

* **LEXICON NMN_TUP-PL** tup:tup 79

* **LEXICON NMN_BIS** bis:bis 79
* **LEXICON NMN_BIS-SG** bis:bis 79

* **LEXICON NMN_BIS-PL** bis:bis 79

* **LEXICON NMN_MAKS** : 80
* **LEXICON NMN_MAKS-SG** : 80

* **LEXICON NMN_MAKS-PL** : 80

* **LEXICON NMN_LUʼM** luʼm:lum 81
* **LEXICON NMN_LUʼM-SG** lum:luʼm 81

* **LEXICON NMN_LUʼM-PL** lum:luʼm 81

* **LEXICON NMN_MIEʼR** mieʼr:mīeʼr 82
* **LEXICON NMN_MIEʼR-SG** mieʼr:mieʼr 82

* **LEXICON NMN_MIEʼR-PL** mier:mīeʼr 82

* **LEXICON NMN_MEʼR** mer:mīeʼr 83
* **LEXICON NMN_MEʼR-SG** meʼr:mer 83

* **LEXICON NMN_MEʼR-PL** mer:mīeʼr 83

* **LEXICON NMN_MUʼR** muʼr:mur 84
* **LEXICON NMN_MUʼR-SG** muʼr:mur 84

* **LEXICON NMN_MUʼR-PL** mur:muʼr 84

* **LEXICON NMN_KUOʼD** kuoʼd:kuod aig 85
* **LEXICON NMN_KUOʼD-SG** kuoʼd:kuod aig 85

* **LEXICON NMN_KUOʼD-PL** kuoʼd:kuoʼd aig 85

* **LEXICON NMN_SUʼŽ** suž:suʼd 86
* **LEXICON NMN_SUʼŽ-SG** suž:suʼd 86

* **LEXICON NMN_SUʼŽ-PL** suʼž:suž 86

* **LEXICON NMN_KEʼŽ** kež:käʼd aim 87
* **LEXICON NMN_KEʼŽ-SG** kež:käʼd aim 87

* **LEXICON NMN_KEʼŽ-PL** keʼž:käʼd aim 87

* **LEXICON NMN_VEʼŽ** veʼž:vieʼd 88
* **LEXICON NMN_VEʼŽ-SG** veʼž:vieʼd 88

* **LEXICON NMN_VEʼŽ-PL** veʼž:veʼd 88

* **LEXICON NMN_KUʼŽ** kuʼž:kuž 89
* **LEXICON NMN_KUʼŽ-SG** kuʼž:kuž 89
* **LEXICON NMN_KUʼŽ-PL** kuʼž:kuž 89

* **LEXICON NMN_RUZŪ** : 90
* **LEXICON NMN_RUZŪ-SG** : 90

* **LEXICON NMN_RUZŪ-PL** : 90

* **LEXICON NMN_RADIO** : 91
* **LEXICON NMN_RADIO-SG** : 91

* **LEXICON NMN_RADIO-PL** : 91

* **LEXICON NMN_ANG** : 92
* **LEXICON NMN_ANG-SG** : 92 ang:āng
* **LEXICON NMN_ANG-PL** : 92

* **LEXICON NMN_KOUV** : 93
* **LEXICON NMN_KOUV-SG** : 93
* **LEXICON NMN_KOUV-PL** : 93

* **LEXICON NMN_KAITS** : 94
* **LEXICON NMN_KAITS-SG** : 94
* **LEXICON NMN_KAITS-PL** : 94

* **LEXICON NMN_SERK** : 94
* **LEXICON NMN_SERK-SG** : 94
* **LEXICON NMN_SERK-PL** : 94

* **LEXICON NMN_KAND** : 94
* **LEXICON NMN_KAND-SG** : 94
* **LEXICON NMN_KAND-PL** : 94

* **LEXICON NMN_PȮRT** : 95
* **LEXICON NMN_PȮRT-SG** : 95
* **LEXICON NMN_PȮRT-PL** : 95

* **LEXICON NMN_NUŖM** : 96 nuŗm:nūrm
* **LEXICON NMN_NUŖM-SG** : 96
* **LEXICON NMN_NUŖM-PL** : 96

* **LEXICON NMN_SUOŖM** : 96b
* **LEXICON NMN_SUOŖM-SG** : 96b
* **LEXICON NMN_SUOŖM-PL** : 96b

* **LEXICON NMN_LAINT** : 97
* **LEXICON NMN_LAINT-SG** : 97
* **LEXICON NMN_LAINT-PL** : 97

* **LEXICON NMN_LOUL** : 98
* **LEXICON NMN_LOUL-SG** : 98
* **LEXICON NMN_LOUL-PL** : 98

* **LEXICON NMN_UL** : 99 ul:ul
* **LEXICON NMN_UL-SG** : 99
* **LEXICON NMN_UL-PL** : 99

* **LEXICON NMN_PAN** : 100
* **LEXICON NMN_PAN-SG** : 100
* **LEXICON NMN_PAN-PL** : 100

102
* **LEXICON NMN_NIŖȚ** : 102 niŗț:nīŗț
First-syllable Vowel lengthening in Pl
Stød: None
* **LEXICON NMN_NIŖȚ-SG** : 102
* **LEXICON NMN_NIŖȚ-PL** : 102

* **LEXICON NMN_KUĻ** : 103 kuļ:kūļ
* **LEXICON NMN_KUĻ-SG** : 103
* **LEXICON NMN_KUĻ-PL** : 103

* **LEXICON NMN_PAŅ** : 104
* **LEXICON NMN_PAŅ-SG** : 104

* **LEXICON NMN_PAŅ-PL** : 104

* **LEXICON NMN_DAŅTŠ** : 105
* **LEXICON NMN_DAŅTŠ-SG** : 105

* **LEXICON NMN_DAŅTŠ-PL** : 105
